Missouri, session 2026, SB1429.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 143.591, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 143.591,
to read as follows:
143.591. The director of revenue may prescribe
regulations and instructions requiring returns of
information to be made and filed on or before February
twenty-eighth of each year by any person making payment or
crediting in any calendar year the amounts of one thousand
two hundred dollars or more (one hundred dollars or more in
the case of interest or dividends) to any person who may be
subject to the tax imposed under sections 143.011 to
143.996. Such returns may be required of any person,
including lessees or mortgagors of real or personal
property, fiduciaries, employers, and all officers and
employees of this state, or of any municipal corporation or
political subdivision of this state, having the control,
receipt, custody, disposal or payment of dividends,
interest, rents, salaries, wages, premiums, annuities,
compensations, remunerations, emoluments or other fixed or
determinable gains, profits, or income, except interest
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1429 2
coupons payable to bearer. A duplicate of the statement as
to tax withheld on wages, required to be furnished by an
employer to an employee, shall constitute the return of
information required to be made under this section with
respect to such wages. Such return shall not be required
unless the person is required to file a return or report
containing the same or similar information to the United
States Internal Revenue Service. Beginning January 1,
[2018] 2026, such returns for tax withheld on wages paid in
the previous tax year submitted by an employer with [at
least two hundred fifty employees] an amount of employees
that meets or exceeds the threshold as prescribed in 26
C.F.R. 301.6011-2 shall be submitted electronically by
January thirty-first. Such returns shall be submitted using
the same file specifications for filing forms electronically
with the Social Security Administration. If an employer is
granted a waiver of the federal requirement to file
electronically by the Internal Revenue Service, the filing
of a copy of the approved waiver with the director shall
automatically waive the requirement to file electronically
with the director.
✓